src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IMPERS_DA     ! if infinitive affix is -da, then ...
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IMPERS_DA_COMP ;
                      :»d TAV_DERIVATION ;       ! keedav, keedavalt, ... 
                      :»d TAMATU_DERIVATION ;    ! keedamatu 
                      :»d TU_DERIVATION ;        ! keedu, keedult, keeduim, ... 

LEXICON IMPERS_DA_COMP    ! impersonal forms 
                      :%>d IMPERS_DUD ;     ! keedud
                      :%>d IMPERS_AKSE ;    ! keedakse

! ---------------

LEXICON AJAMA      ! only ajama; almost like VEDAMA

                      :%{W%} IMPERS ;        ! aetud
                      :a SUPINE_V ;          ! ajama
                      :a INFINITIVE ;        ! ajada
                      :a IMPERATIVE ;        ! ajagu
                      :a NU ;                ! ajanud
                      :a%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;    ! ajas
                      :a IND_COND_PRS ;      ! ajab

LEXICON VEDAMA     ! VVS 28 vedama, pügama, pidama

                      :e%{W%} IMPERS ;       ! veetud
                      :a SUPINE_V ;          ! vedama
                      :a INFINITIVE ;        ! vedada
                      :a IMPERATIVE ;        ! vedagu
                      :a NU ;                ! vedanud
                      :a%>I7S7 IND_PAST ;    ! vedas
                      :a%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! veab

LEXICON PIDAMA     ! only pidama-pidi

                      ! no impersonal forms
                      :a SUPINE_V ;          ! pidama
                      :a INFINITIVE ;        ! pidada
                      :a IMPERATIVE ;        ! pidagu
                      :a NU ;                ! pidanud
                      :%>I7 IND_PAST ;       ! pidi
                      :a%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! peab

LEXICON TEGEMA     ! only tegema, nägema

                      :h%> A_INFINITIVE ;    ! teha
                      :h IMPERS_A ;          ! tehakse, tehtud
                      :ge SUPINE_V ;         ! tegema
                      :h IMPERATIVE ;        ! tehku
                      :i NU ;                ! teinud
                      :g%>I7 IND_PAST ;      ! tegi
                      :e%{W%} IND_COND_PRS ; ! teeb

! a verb cannot participate in compounding;
! it has to be turned into a declinable word first
! flag diacritics are set on paths that are NOT changing the verb word class
! the flag diacritic @R.Part.One@ requires the stem to be the first in this word;
! and then @P.Part.Bad@ ensures that no further parts are possible

LEXICON IND_COND_PRS    ! indicative, conditional present + imp sg2
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IMPRT2_COMP ;
             +Pers+Prs:%> IND_PRS ;
             +Pers+Prs:%> CONDITIONAL ;
                      : NG_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON IMPRT2_COMP    ! 
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2:%> GI ;

LEXICON IND_PRS     ! indicative present 
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IND_PRS_COMP ;

LEXICON IND_PRS_COMP     ! indicative present 
              +Ind+Neg: GI ;
                  +Ind: SG1 ;
                  +Ind: SG2 ;
                  +Ind: SG3B ;
                  +Ind: PL1 ;
                  +Ind: PL2 ;
                  +Ind: PL3VAD ;
            
LEXICON IND_PAST    ! indicative past
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IND_PAST_COMP ;
         +Pers+Prt+Ind:i MARKED_PERSON ;

LEXICON IND_PAST_COMP    ! indicative past
         +Pers+Prt+Ind: SG3 ;

LEXICON NU    !  NU-affixes
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ NU_COMP ;
             +Pers+Prt:%>nu CONDITIONAL ; ! conditional past
                      : NU_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON NU_COMP    !  NU-affixes
             !+Pers+Prt+Imprt:%>nud GI ;         ! omitted for now because it would create homonymy
            +Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg:%>nud GI ;
                +Pers+Prt+Prc:%>nud GI ;
               +Pers+Prt+Quot:%>nuvat GI ;
+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Use/NotNorm:%>nd GI ;
    +Pers+Prt+Prc+Use/NotNorm:%>nd GI ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE    ! imperative
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IMPERATIVE_COMP ;

LEXICON IMPERATIVE_COMP    ! imperative
       +Pers+Prs+Imprt:%>G7u GI ;         ! elagu
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1:%>G7em GI ;        ! elagem
   +Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2:%>G7e GI ;         ! elage

LEXICON SUPINE_V
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ SUPINE_V_COMP ;
             +Pers+Sup:%>ma SUPINE ;
                      : MINE_DERIVATION ;    ! elamine
                      : JA_DERIVATION ;      ! elaja, õpetaja, õpetajanna, õpetajake, õpetajalik, ...
                      : V_DERIVATION ;       ! õpetav, õpetavalt, õpetavus, õpetavam, ...
                      : MATU_DERIVATION ;    ! segamatu, segamatult, segamatus, segamatum, ...
                      : MATA_DERIVATION ;     ! segamata
                      : MUS_DERIVATION ;     ! küllastumus, promoveerumus etc

LEXICON SUPINE_V_COMP
         +Pers+Prs+Prc:%>v GI ;
        +Pers+Prs+Quot:%>vat GI ;

LEXICON SUPINE
 @R.Part.One@ SUPINE_COMP ;     ! Note that these forms can be 1st part of a compound

LEXICON SUPINE_COMP
                      : ILLATIVE ;          ! elama
                      :%>s INESSIVE ;       ! elamas
                      :%>st ELATIVE ;
                      :%>ks TRANSLATIVE ;
                      :%>ta ABESSIVE ;

LEXICON IMPERS    ! impersonal forms for most paradigms
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ IMPERS_COMP ;
                      :»T7 TAV_DERIVATION ;       ! elatav, elatavalt, elatavam, elatavaim, ... 
                      :»T7 TAMATU_DERIVATION ;       ! elatav, elatavalt, elatavam, elatavaim, ... 
                      :»T7 TU_DERIVATION ;       ! elatu, elatult, elatum, elatuim 

LEXICON IMPERS_COMP    ! impersonal forms for most paradigms
                      :%>T7 IMPERS_DUD ;
                      :%>T7 IMPERS_AKSE ;

LEXICON IMPERS_DUD    ! impersonal forms -[td]ud

      +Impers+Prs+Cond:aks GI ;
     +Impers+Prs+Imprt:agu GI ;
   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg:a GI ;
       +Impers+Prs+Prc:av GI ;
      +Impers+Prs+Quot:avat GI ;
      +Impers+Prt+Cond:uks GI ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff:i GI ;
   +Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg:ud GI ;
       +Impers+Prt+Prc:ud GI ;
           +Impers+Sup:ama GI ;

LEXICON IMPERS_AKSE    ! impersonal form -[td0]akse

   +Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff:akse GI ;

LEXICON INFINITIVE    ! infinitive, gerund (des-form)

                      :%>D7 A_INFINITIVE ;

LEXICON A_INFINITIVE   ! common part of an infinitive, gerund (des-form);
                       ! also alone in a subparadigm of a few old words

 @R.Part.One@             INF_COMP ;     ! This can be 1st part of a compound
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ GER_COMP ;

LEXICON INF_COMP
                  +Inf:a GI ;
LEXICON GER_COMP
                  +Ger:es GI ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL    ! conditional present and past  
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ CONDITIONAL_COMP ;
                 +Cond:ksi MARKED_PERSON ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL_COMP
                 +Cond:ks GI ;

LEXICON MARKED_PERSON     ! sg3 ~ underspecified is missing from here 
 @R.Part.One@@P.Part.Bad@ MARKED_PERSON_COMP ;

LEXICON MARKED_PERSON_COMP     ! sg3 ~ underspecified is missing from here 
                      : SG1 ;
                      : SG2 ;
                      : PL1 ;
                      : PL2 ;
                      : PL3 ;

LEXICON SG1
              +Sg1+Aff:n GI ;

LEXICON SG2
              +Sg2+Aff:d GI ;

LEXICON SG3
              +Sg3+Aff: GI ;

LEXICON SG3B
              +Sg3+Aff:b GI ;

LEXICON PL1
              +Pl1+Aff:me GI ;

LEXICON PL2
              +Pl2+Aff:te GI ;

LEXICON PL3
              +Pl3+Aff:d GI ;

LEXICON PL3VAD
              +Pl3+Aff:vad GI ;

! paradigmatic derivation, i.e. very regular
! @R.Part.One@ means that this is not a latter part of a compound 
! @R.Case.Par@ and @R.Case.Gen@ mean that this is a latter part of a compound 
! and the previous word must be either in Par or Gen for this derivation to be allowable
