src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SimpleVerbs
ametit=pidama+V:ametit=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
araks=tegema+V:araks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
aru=pidama+V:aru=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
asju=ajama+V:˘asʲju=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
avali=ajama+V:avali=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
duelli=pidama+V:du˘elʲli=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ebaselgeks=ajama+V:eba%#s˘elgeks=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ebaühtlaseks=tegema+V:eba%#˘ühtlaseks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ette=ajama+V:˘ette=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ettevalmistusi=tegema+V:˘ette%#valʲmistusi=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
haisu=ajama+V:h˘aisu=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hirmu=tegema+V:h˘irmu=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ilmavalgust=nägema+V:ilma%#v˘algust=nä TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jahti=pidama+V:j˘ahti=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jalule=ajama+V:jalule=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
joonde=ajama+V:j˘oonde=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jutlust=pidama+V:j˘utlust=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
jälgi=ajama+V:j˘älʲgi=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
järeldust=tegema+V:järeldust=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahevõitlust=pidama+V:kahe%#v˘õitlust=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kalli-kalli=tegema+V:k˘alʲli-k˘alʲli=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaupa=tegema+V:k˘aupa=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kehtivaks=pidama+V:k˘ehtivaks=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kihutust=tegema+V:kihutust=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kikki=ajama+V:k˘ikki=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kinni=pidama+V:k˘inʲni=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiusu=ajama+V:k˘iusu=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohaseks=tegema+V:kohaseks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
konserviks=tegema+V:konsˈerviks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kuivendustöid=tegema+V:kuivendus%#t˘öid=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
kummuli=ajama+V:kummuli=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
leebeks=tegema+V:l˘eebeks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lihavaks=ajama+V:lihavaks=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lugu=pidama+V:lugu=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
lörri=ajama+V:l˘örri=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
madalamaks=tegema+V:madalamaks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
meeles=pidama+V:meeles=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
mürglit=tegema+V:m˘ürglit=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
naerma=ajama+V:n˘aerma=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
nahka=vedama+V:n˘ahka=veD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pidama+V:piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 2 " ; 
nõge=ajama+V:nõge=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
närviliseks=tegema+V:närviliseks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
paastu=pidama+V:p˘aastu=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
paljaks=ajama+V:p˘alʲjaks=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
paremaks=pidama+V:paremaks=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pehmemaks=tegema+V:p˘ehmemaks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pidama+V:piD1 PIDAMA  "weight: 2 " ; 
piiri=pidama+V:p˘iiri=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
positiivseks=pidama+V:posit˘iivseks=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
puhevile=ajama+V:puhevile=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
puupaljaks=tegema+V:p˘uu%#p˘alʲjaks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
põhja=vedama+V:p˘õhja=veD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pügama+V:püG1 VEDAMA  "weight: 9 " ; 
sagrisse=ajama+V:sagrisse=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
saleduskuuri=tegema+V:saledus%#k˘uuri=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
segi=ajama+V:segi=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
silmas=pidama+V:silmas=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sogaseks=tegema+V:sogaseks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
suitsu=vedama+V:s˘uitsu=veD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sulgi=ajama+V:s˘ulʲgi=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sõda=pidama+V:sõda=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
sünteesi=tegema+V:sünt˘eesi=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tagant=ajama+V:tagant=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tallel=pidama+V:tallel=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tegema+V:te TEGEMA  "weight: 3 " ; 
teravamaks=tegema+V:teravamaks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tükke=tegema+V:t˘ükke=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
tülli=ajama+V:t˘ülʲli=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahti=pidama+V:v˘ahti=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
valet=ajama+V:valet=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
valmis=tegema+V:v˘alʲmis=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
vedama+V:veD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 6 " ; 
virgemaks=tegema+V:virgemaks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
võõraks=pidama+V:v˘õõraks=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
välja=ajama+V:v˘älʲja=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
õigeks=pidama+V:˘õigeks=piD1 VEDAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ära=ajama+V:ära=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ühtlaseks=tegema+V:˘ühtlaseks=te TEGEMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
ümber=ajama+V:˘ümber=aE4 AJAMA  "weight: 11 " ; 
